Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF134.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1504YH (3) 91 sb/js H.F. 134 Section 1. Section 484B.1, subsection 7, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 7. a. âLivestockâ means the same as defined in section 3 717.1 an animal belonging to the bovine, caprine, equine, 4 ovine, or porcine species; ostriches, rheas, or emus; farm deer 5 as defined in section 170.1; or poultry . 6 b. âLivestockâ does not include bison or nondomesticated 7 haired sheep being hunted or kept for hunting purposes when on 8 a hunting preserve licensed under this chapter. 9 Sec. 2. Section 717.2, subsection 1, paragraph c, Code 2025, 10 is amended to read as follows: 11 c. Injures or destroys livestock by any means which 12 that causes pain or suffering in a manner inconsistent with 13 customary animal husbandry practices. This paragraph does not 14 apply to bison or nondomesticated haired sheep being hunted or 15 kept for hunting purposes when on a hunting preserve licensed 16 under chapter 484B. 17